Utah statutes.
53B-3-102.   "State institution of higher education" defined.

(1)  As used in this chapter, "state institution of higher education" means the University of Utah, Utah State University, Southern Utah University, Weber State University, Snow College, Dixie State College of Utah, Utah Valley University, Salt Lake Community College, and any other university or college which may be established and maintained by the state.

(2)  It includes any branch or affiliated institution and any campus or facilities owned, operated, or controlled by the governing board of the university or college.



Amended by Chapter 211, 2010 General Session

